Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.260

License renewal—Fee—Examination—Fee.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1)(a) Prior to July 1, 2005, (i) a cosmetology licensee who held a license in good standing between June 30, 1999, and June 30, 2003, may request a renewal of the license or an additional license in barbering, manicuring, and/or esthetics; and (ii) a licensee who held a barber, manicurist, or esthetics license between June 30, 1999, and June 30, 2003, may request a renewal of such licenses held during that period.

(b) A license renewal fee, including, if applicable, a renewal fee, at the current rate, for each year the licensee did not hold a license in good standing between July 1, 2001, and the date of the renewal request, must be paid prior to issuance of each type of license requested. After June 30, 2005, any cosmetology licensee wishing to renew an expired license or obtain additional licenses must meet the applicable renewal, training, and examination requirements of this chapter.

(2)(a) Any person holding an active license in good standing as an esthetician prior to January 1, 2015, may be licensed as an esthetician licensee after paying the appropriate license fee.

(b) Prior to January 1, 2015, an applicant for a master esthetician license must have an active license in good standing as an esthetician, pay the appropriate license fee, and provide the department with proof of having satisfied one or more of the following requirements:

(i)(A)(I) A minimum of thirty-five hours employment as a provider of medium depth peels under the delegation or supervision of a licensed physician, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant, or other licensed professional whose licensure permits such delegation or supervision; or

(II) Seven hours of training in theory and application of medium depth peels; and

(B)(I) A minimum of one hundred fifty hours employment as a laser operator under the delegation or supervision of a licensed physician, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant, or other licensed professional whose licensure permits such delegation or supervision; or

(II) Seventy-five hours of laser training;

(ii) A national or international diploma or certification in esthetics that is recognized by the department by rule;

(iii) An instructor in esthetics who has been licensed as an instructor in esthetics by the department for a minimum of three years; or

(iv) Completion of one thousand two hundred hours of an esthetic curriculum approved by the department.

(3) The director may, as provided in RCW 43.24.140, modify the duration of any additional license granted under this section to make all licenses issued to a person expire on the same date.

[2013 c 187 s 11; 2004 c 51 s 5; 2002 c 111 s 16.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Notice of chapter 51, Laws of 2004—Effective date—2004 c 51: See notes following RCW 18.16.060.

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.